Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.070

General public school system—Administration.

The administration of the public school system shall be entrusted to such state and local officials, boards, and committees as the state Constitution and the laws of the state shall provide.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.020. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 230 s 2; RRS s 4519; prior: 1897 c 118 s 19; 1890 p 348 s 2; Code 1881 ss 3154, 3155; 1861 p 55 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.02.020, 28.02.020.]